Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.620

Convention—Notice.

Each minor party or independent candidate must publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the party or the candidate intends to hold a convention. The notice must appear at least ten days before the convention is to be held, and shall state the date, time, and place of the convention. Additionally, it shall include the mailing address of the person or organization sponsoring the convention.

[ 2004 c 271 s 189. Formerly RCW 29A.20.131.]